Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 2. Surface Coal Mining.

Administrative Code. —

For surface coal mining, see 11 AAC 90.

Sec. 27.21.020.
Jurisdiction.

The commissioner of natural resources has exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch. 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.020. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.030.
General powers.

To accomplish the purposes of this chapter, the commissioner may

in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) adopt, amend, and enforce regulations pertaining to surface coal mining and reclamation operations;

issue permits;

conduct hearings and conferences;

issue orders requiring an operator to take the actions necessary to comply with this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter;

issue orders modifying previous orders;

after opportunity for a due process hearing, issue a final order revoking the permit of an operator who has failed to comply with an order of the commissioner to take action required by this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter;

order the immediate cessation of all or part of a surface coal mining and reclamation operation if the commissioner finds that the operation or part of the operation creates an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public or is causing or can reasonably be expected to cause significant imminent harm to land, air, or water resources, and, to the extent reasonably necessary to eliminate or alleviate those conditions, take other action or make changes in a permit, as provided in this chapter;

hire and authorize the hiring of employees and private contractors, subject to the conflict of interest provisions of this chapter and subject to AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), to assist in carrying out the requirements of this chapter;

enter and inspect a surface coal mining operation that is subject to the provisions of this chapter to assure that the operation is in compliance with this chapter;

conduct, encourage, request, and participate in studies, surveys, investigations, research, experiments, training, and demonstrations;

prepare reports and require permittees to prepare reports;

accept, receive, and administer grants, gifts, or other money made available for the purposes of this chapter regardless of the source of the grants, gifts, or money;

take the steps necessary to allow the state to participate to the fullest extent practicable in the abandoned mine land program provided in Title IV of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, including engaging in any work and adopting, amending and enforcing regulations;

take the actions necessary to establish and maintain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations in the state under the provisions of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, including making recommendations for legislation to clarify or amend this chapter to conform with the terms of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977;

contract with state agencies to obtain the professional and technical services necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

coordinate the review of applications and issuance of permits for surface coal mining and reclamation operations with other federal or state permit processes applicable to those operations;

enter into cooperative agreements with the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior for the regulation of surface coal mining operations on federal land in accordance with the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977; and

perform other duties required by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 27 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.030. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For adoption by reference, see 11 AAC 90, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

The Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 may be found at 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.

Sec. 27.21.040.
Provisions of regulations and permits.

The provisions of a regulation adopted or a permit issued by the commissioner may vary for particular conditions, types of coal being extracted, or areas of the state if the provisions are consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch. 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.040. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.050.
Conflict of interest.

An employee of the department or a private contractor performing a function or duty under this chapter may not have a direct or indirect financial interest in an underground or surface coal mining operation.
A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.050. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 27.21.060.
Permits.

Beginning eight months after May 2, 1983, a person may not conduct a surface coal mining and reclamation operation in the state without a permit for that operation. To receive a permit, a person must apply to the commissioner. The commissioner shall process applications according to this chapter and regulations adopted under it.

[Repealed, § 82 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 82 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.060. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.070.
Term of permit.

Permits will be issued for a term of five years. However, the commissioner may grant a permit for a longer term if the application is complete for that longer term and the applicant demonstrates that the longer term is necessary to allow the applicant to obtain financing for equipment or for the opening of the operation.

A permit terminates if a permittee does not begin surface coal mining operations under the permit within three years after the permit is issued. The commissioner may grant reasonable extensions of time if the permittee shows that the extensions are necessary (1) because of litigation that precludes the commencement of the operation or threatens substantial economic loss to the permittee; or (2) for reasons beyond the control and without the fault or negligence of the permittee. With respect to coal to be mined for use in a synthetic fuel facility or specific major electric generating facility, the permittee is considered to have begun surface mining operations at the time that the construction of the synthetic fuel or generating facility is begun.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.070. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.080.
Renewal of permit.

A permit issued under this chapter includes the right of successive renewal upon expiration, for areas within the boundaries of the permit area. An opponent of renewal of a permit has the burden of proving that the permit should not be renewed. Subject to (c) of this section, if a permittee applies for renewal of the permit, the commissioner shall renew the permit after public notice is given in the manner provided in AS

27.21.130

unless the commissioner finds, in writing, that

the terms and conditions of the permit have not been satisfactorily met, and the permittee has not demonstrated to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the permittee is meeting and will continue to meet a schedule set by the commissioner under AS

27.21.240(a)

or (b) for correcting a permit violation;

the surface coal mining and reclamation operation of the permittee is not in compliance with the environmental protection standards of this chapter and regulations adopted under it;

the requested renewal substantially jeopardizes the permittee’s continuing responsibility on existing permit areas;

the permittee has not either

provided sufficient evidence that the performance bond under AS

27.21.160

in effect for the operation will continue for the renewal period requested in the application, and that any additional bond required by the commissioner under AS

27.21.160

will be obtained; or

when seeking to use the statewide bonding pool for mining operations established under AS

27.19.040(b)

, complied with all requirements of the bonding pool; or

information required by the commissioner in accordance with this chapter has not been provided by the permittee.

The commissioner shall provide notice to the appropriate public authorities as provided in AS

38.05.945

before approving a permit renewal.

If an application for renewal of a permit includes a proposal to extend the permittee’s surface coal mining operations to include new land areas beyond the boundaries authorized in the permit, the commissioner shall review the part of the application that addresses the new land areas under the standards established in AS

27.21.180

. However, if the surface coal mining operations authorized by a permit are not subject to the standards contained in AS

27.21.180(c)(5)(A)

and (B), the part of the application for renewal that addresses new land areas previously identified in the reclamation plan submitted under AS

27.21.110

is not subject to the standards contained in AS

27.21.180(c)(5)(A)

and (B).

A permit may be renewed for an additional term of five years. The commissioner must receive the application for a permit renewal at least 120 days before the expiration of the permit.

If a renewal application is received by the commissioner at least 120 days before the expiration date of the permit, and if the permittee has complied with AS

27.21.160

, the permittee may continue surface coal mining operations under the permit after the expiration date of the permit until a final administrative decision on renewal is made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.080. Renumbered in 1983.

In 1984, in subsection (b), “AS

38.05.945

” was substituted for “AS

38.05.345

” to reflect the 1984 renumbering of

38.05.345

.

Sec. 27.21.090.
Application fee.

An application for a new permit, permit renewal, or transfer of a permit must be accompanied by an application fee.
The commissioner shall adopt regulations setting out a fee schedule.
The application fee may not exceed the actual or anticipated costs of reviewing the application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.090. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.100.
Public information and inspection.

An applicant for a permit shall file a copy of the application for public inspection at a location designated by the commissioner near the area of the proposed surface coal mining operation. The applicant may exclude from the copy filed under this subsection information that is confidential under (c) of this section.

Copies of records, permits, inspection materials, data obtained under AS

27.21.120

, or other information obtained under this chapter by the commissioner relating to a surface coal mining and reclamation operation, other than information that is confidential under (c) of this section, must be made immediately and conveniently available to the public at the district office of the department closest to the location of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation.

Information

gathered from the proposed permit area included in the application for a permit and pertaining to coal seams, test borings, core samplings, or soil samples must be made available to any person with an interest that is or may be adversely affected, except that information that relates only to the analysis of the chemical and physical properties of the coal, other than information regarding the mineral or elemental content that is potentially toxic in the environment, must be kept confidential and not made a matter of public record;

in the applicant’s reclamation plan relating to the competitive rights of the applicant, including but not limited to trade secrets, commercial or financial information, and geologic information specifically identified as confidential by the applicant and determined by the commissioner to be not essential for public review shall be kept confidential and not be made a matter of public record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.100. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.110.
Contents of application.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations relating to the contents of an application for a permit under this chapter that include a reclamation plan and liability insurance consistent with the requirements of 30 U.S.C. 1257(b) and 30 U.S.C. 1258, as amended. The regulations must take into account the unique mining and environmental conditions of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.110. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.120.
Small operator assistance.

The provisions of this section apply when the commissioner finds that the probable total annual production of all of the surface coal mining operations of an applicant or, if the applicant is a subsidiary of another corporation, the applicant’s parent corporation and its subsidiaries will not exceed 300,000 tons.

At the written request of an applicant, the commissioner shall

determine, for each applicant or applicant’s parent corporation and subsidiaries, as appropriate, the data that may be necessary in order to

evaluate the probable hydrologic consequences of the applicant’s surface mining and reclamation operations in the proposed permit area and adjacent areas;

evaluate the results of test borings on core samplings for the proposed permit area;

develop cross-section maps and plans, if required;

fulfill archeological and historic information required by AS

44.37.040

(3);

fulfill all requirements that are imposed on the applicant or the applicant’s parent corporation and subsidiaries if, under a regulation adopted under authority of this chapter, the applicant or applicant’s parent corporation is required to complete a preblasting survey of nearby dwellings or structures and to prepare a report of the survey; and

fulfill requirements applicable to collecting site-specific resources information, producing protection and enhancement plans for fish and wildlife habitats and for subsistence uses of the permit area and adjacent areas, and preparing information and plans for any other environmental values; and

to the maximum extent possible with money appropriated, engage, at no cost to the applicant, a qualified laboratory to collect, analyze, and report the results of the data for the tasks set out in (1)(A) — (F) of this subsection.

The collection and analysis of data under (b)(2) of this section may proceed concurrently with the applicant’s development of a reclamation plan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am §§ 2, 3 ch 56 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.120. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.130.
Public notice of application.

At the time an applicant submits an application for a permit or for a revision of a permit, the applicant shall give notice in the manner set out in AS

38.05.945(b)

and (c) except as may be provided otherwise by regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.130. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.140.
Objection to application; informal conference.

A person who is or may be adversely affected by the issuance or revision of a permit or a federal, state, or municipal agency may file written comments or objections to the permit or revision with the commissioner within 30 days after the last publication of the notice required in AS

27.21.130

and may include with the objection a request for an informal conference.

The commissioner shall immediately provide a copy of any comments or objections filed under (a) of this section to the applicant and shall make them available to the public. If an informal conference is requested under (a) of this section, the commissioner shall hold an informal conference in the locality of the operations proposed in the application. Notice requirements and procedures for informal conferences must be set out in regulations adopted under this chapter.

The commissioner shall notify the applicant, any person who filed a comment or objection under (a) of this section, and any participant in an informal conference held under (b) of this section, in writing, of the decision to grant, condition, modify, or deny the permit or revision, and, if the decision is not to grant the permit or revision, of the specific reasons for the decision. The commissioner shall provide notification of the decision within 60 days after an informal conference or, if there has not been an informal conference, within the time established in AS

27.21.180

.

If the application is approved, the permit shall be issued upon filing of the performance bond required by AS

27.21.160

or satisfactory compliance with the requirements of the statewide bonding pool for mining operations established under AS

27.19.040(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.140. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.150.
Hearings.

Within 30 days after an applicant is notified under AS

27.21.140(c)

of the commissioner’s decision concerning the application, the applicant or a person who is or may be adversely affected by the decision may request a hearing to review the reasons for the decision. The commissioner shall hold the hearing within 30 days after the request and shall notify the interested parties of the hearing at the time the applicant is notified. AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to a hearing under this section except as provided by regulations adopted under this chapter.

If a hearing is requested under (a) of this section, the commissioner may, under conditions the commissioner prescribes, grant appropriate temporary relief pending the commissioner’s final decision if

the parties to the hearing have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

the party requesting the temporary relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that the party will prevail in the final decision of the hearing; and

the temporary relief will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent harm to land, air, or water resources.

The person presiding at the hearing may administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, subpoena written or printed materials, compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of materials, and take evidence including but not limited to evidence derived from site inspections of the land that will be affected by the permit or revision and other surface coal mining operations conducted by the applicant in the general vicinity of the operation proposed in the application. On the motion of a party or by order of the commissioner, a verbatim record of a hearing required by this chapter shall be made and a transcript made available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.150. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.160.
Performance bond; exceptions.

Except as provided in (c) and (g) of this section, after an application for a permit has been approved and before the permit may be issued, the applicant must file with the commissioner, on a form prescribed and furnished by the commissioner, a performance bond payable to the State of Alaska and conditioned on faithful performance of the requirements of this chapter and the permit. The bond must cover the area of land within the permit area on which the applicant will initiate and conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the initial term of the permit. As succeeding increments of surface coal mining and reclamation operations are initiated and conducted within the permit area, the permittee shall provide an additional bond or bonds to cover those increments in accordance with this section. The amount of the bond required for an area within the permit area shall be determined by the commissioner and shall reflect the probable difficulty of the reclamation considering the topography, geology, hydrology, revegetation potential, and similar factors relating to the area. The amount of the bond must be sufficient to assure the completion of the reclamation plan by the commissioner in the event of forfeiture and, for the entire permit area, may not be less than $10,000.

Liability under the bond must exist for the duration of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation and for the period of time of the permittee’s responsibility under the performance standards established by regulation under AS

27.21.210

. The bond shall be executed by the applicant and, except as provided in (d) of this section, a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state.

An applicant may deposit with the commissioner cash, negotiable bonds of the United States or of the state, or negotiable certificates of deposit of a bank organized or transacting business in the United States to satisfy the requirements of (a) of this section if

the value of the deposit is equal to or greater than the amount of the bond required under (a) of this section;

liability under the deposit is for a period of time described in (b) of this section; and

the deposit is made under the terms that, under (a) of this section, would apply to a performance bond.

The commissioner may accept a bond executed by the applicant without separate surety if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the applicant has sufficient financial means for the purposes of the bond. The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

The commissioner shall maintain a deposit under (c) of this section in a separate escrow account and shall annually pay the interest accruing on the deposit to the permittee.

The commissioner shall adjust the amount required under (a), (c), or (d) of this section and the terms of the acceptance of that amount if the commissioner determines there is good cause, including changes in affected land areas or in the probable cost of future reclamation, for the adjustment.

As an alternative to performance bonds, applicants conducting surface coal mining and reclamation operations may use the bonding pool established by the commissioner under AS

27.19.040(b)

for reclamation activities to meet the requirements imposed by this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am §§ 4, 5 ch 27 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.160. Renumbered in 1983.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Deed of trust, covering an office building and a shop complex, submitted to comply with the bonding requirements of this section was insufficient because,

inter alia:

1. regulations authorizing the use of deeds of trust were probably invalid; 2. the deed of trust was not a first deed of trust, as required by the questioned regulations; 3. the value of the collateral was insufficient; and 4. the deed of trust did not contain an adequate description of the encumbered property. April 30, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 27.21.170.
Request and release of performance bonds or deposits.

A permittee may file a request with the commissioner for the release of all or part of the permittee’s performance bonds or deposit. The permittee shall give notice in the manner set out in AS

38.05.945(b)

and (c) except as provided by regulations adopted under this chapter.

Within 30 days after receipt of a request under (a) of this section or within a longer period required by field conditions, the commissioner shall inspect and evaluate the reclamation work involved. In the evaluation, the commissioner shall consider the degree of difficulty to complete the reclamation, whether pollution of surface or subsurface water is occurring, the probability of continuance of the pollution, and the estimated cost of abating the pollution. Within 60 days after receipt of the request, or if a hearing relating to the request is conducted under (g) of this section, within 30 days after the hearing, whichever is later, the commissioner shall notify the permittee, in writing, of the decision to release or not to release all or part of the performance bond or deposit.

The commissioner shall release all or part of the bond or deposit in accordance with the following schedule if the commissioner is satisfied that the reclamation or part of the reclamation covered by the bond or deposit has been accomplished as required by this chapter:

if the permittee completes the backfilling, regrading, and drainage control of all or part of a permit area according to the reclamation plan, the commissioner shall release 60 percent of the bond or deposit covering the area;

if the permittee completes revegetation of all or part of the permit area according to the reclamation plan, the commissioner shall release the balance of the bond or deposit covering the revegetated area except for an amount that would be necessary to hire a third party to reestablish revegetation;

if the permittee successfully completes all of the surface coal mining and reclamation activities required by this chapter and the terms of the permit, the commissioner shall release the remaining portion of the bond after expiration of the period of time of the permittee’s responsibility under the performance standards established by regulation under AS

27.21.210

; however, a bond or deposit may not be fully released until all reclamation requirements are fully met.

The commissioner may not release all or part of a bond or deposit under (c)(2) of this section if

the permit area or part of a permit area covered by the bond or deposit is in violation of the performance standards established by regulation under AS

27.21.210

; or

a silt dam is to be retained as a permanent water impoundment under the performance standards established by regulation under AS

27.21.210

and the permittee has not, in the determination of the commissioner, made adequate provisions for the sound future maintenance of the silt dam.

If the commissioner disapproves a request filed under (a) of this section, the commissioner shall notify the permittee of the decision in writing. The notice must include the reasons for the disapproval, a description of the actions necessary to secure the release, and notification of the permittee’s right to a hearing under (g) of this section.

If a request is filed with the commissioner under (a) of this section, the commissioner shall notify the appropriate municipality, if any, at least 30 days before the release of all or part of the bond or deposit.

A person with a valid legal interest that might be adversely affected by release of a bond or deposit under this section or a federal, state, or municipal agency that has jurisdiction over an environmental, social, or economic impact involved in the permittee’s operation or that has authority to develop and enforce environmental standards with respect to the permittee’s operation, may, within 30 days after the last publication of notice required by (a) of this section, file written objections to the request with the commissioner and may request a hearing. A permittee whose request for release of all or part of a bond or deposit is disapproved may request a hearing within 30 days after receipt of written notification of the disapproval under (e) of this section. If a hearing is requested, the commissioner shall inform the interested parties of the time and place of the hearing and shall hold the hearing within 30 days after the request for the hearing. The commissioner shall publish the date, time, and location of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality for two consecutive weeks. The commissioner shall conduct the public hearing and any appeal according to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) except as provided by regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.170. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.180.
Application approval or denial.

Within 120 days after receipt of a complete application for a permit or for revision or renewal of a permit, the commissioner shall grant, condition, modify, or deny the application and notify the applicant in writing of the commissioner’s action. The applicant has the burden of establishing that the application complies with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted under it. Within 10 days after approving an application, the commissioner shall record in the recording district in which the permit area is located notice that a permit has been issued. The notice must describe the location of the permit area and state where a copy of the permit may be obtained.

If the commissioner requests modification of an application, the commissioner shall state in writing which parts need modification and in what manner, and which parts of the application meet approval. The applicant will then need only to correct the deficient portion and resubmit the application. However, the commissioner may at any time require additional information from the applicant if the requirement is based on good cause and on a written finding that the additional information is necessary for the commissioner to determine whether the proposed operation will meet the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted under it. After receipt of the information requested, the commissioner has 60 days to approve, condition, or deny the permit as described in (a) of this section.

The commissioner may not approve an application for a permit or for revision of a permit unless the application demonstrates and the commissioner finds, in writing and on the basis of information included in the application or information that is otherwise available to the commissioner and that the commissioner documents in the approval and makes available to the applicant, that

the application is accurate and complete and that it complies with the requirements of this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter;

the applicant has demonstrated that reclamation as required by this chapter and regulations adopted under it can be accomplished under the reclamation plan contained in the application;

an assessment of the probable cumulative impact of all anticipated surface coal mining in the area on the hydrologic balance has been made by the commissioner, and that the proposed operation has been designed to prevent material damage to the hydrologic balance outside the permit area;

the area proposed to be mined is not included within an area that

is designated as unsuitable for surface coal mining under AS

27.21.260

; or

is being considered by the commissioner for designation in an administrative proceeding commenced under AS

27.21.260

, unless the applicant demonstrates that before January 1, 1977, the applicant made substantial legal and financial commitments in relation to the proposed operation for which the applicant is applying for a permit;

the proposed surface coal mining operation will not

interrupt, discontinue, or preclude farming on an alluvial valley that is irrigated or naturally subirrigated, excluding undeveloped range land that is not significant to farming on the alluvial valley floor and land on which the farming that will be interrupted, discontinued, or precluded is so small as to have negligible impact on the farm’s total agricultural production; or

materially damage the quantity or quality of water in surface or underground water systems that supply an alluvial valley floor; and

if the ownership of the coal in the permit area has been severed from the private surface estate, the applicant has submitted to the commissioner

the written consent of the surface owner to the extraction of the coal by surface mining methods;

a conveyance that expressly grants or reserves the right to extract the coal by surface mining methods; or

a determination of a court that the applicant is authorized to extract coal by surface mining methods in the permit area; however, nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize the commissioner to adjudicate property rights disputes.

The provisions of (c)(5) of this section do not apply to a surface coal mining operation that, in the 12-month period preceding August 3, 1977, produced coal in commercial quantities and was located within or adjacent to an alluvial valley floor.

An applicant shall file with an application a list of all cited violations of this chapter and all cited violations of a law, rule, or regulation of the United States, the state, or a department or agency of the United States pertaining to air or water environmental protection received by the applicant in connection with a surface coal mining operation within the United States during the three-year period before the date of filing the application. The list must indicate the final resolution, if any, of the violations. If the list or other information available to the commissioner indicates that a surface coal mining operation owned or controlled by the applicant is currently in violation of this chapter or of a law, rule, or regulation described in this subsection, the commissioner may not approve the application until the applicant submits proof that

the violation has been corrected or is being corrected to the satisfaction of the commissioner or to the satisfaction of the agency responsible for the enforcement of the law, rule, or regulation if the violation is not of this chapter; or

the applicant is involved in an administrative or judicial proceeding to determine whether the applicant has committed the violation.

The commissioner may not approve an application under this section if the commissioner finds, after providing the applicant with an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the procedures established in AS

27.21.150

, that the applicant, or the operator specified in the application, controls or has controlled mining operations with a demonstrated pattern of wilful violations of this chapter of such nature and duration and with such resulting irreparable damage to the environment as to indicate an intent not to comply with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.180. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.190.
Revision and transfer of permit.

During the term of a permit, the permittee may submit to the commissioner an application for revision of the permit, with necessary revisions to the permittee’s reclamation plan.

The commissioner may not approve an application for revision of a permit unless the commissioner finds that reclamation required by this chapter and the regulations adopted under it can be accomplished under the necessary revisions to the reclamation plan. The commissioner shall establish guidelines for determining the extent of revision for which all permit application requirements and procedures, including notice and hearing, shall apply. A revision that, in the commissioner’s determination, requires significant revisions to the applicant’s reclamation plan must, at a minimum, be subject to a notice and hearing requirement.

A permittee may not apply under this section for an extension of the permit area, except by incidental boundary revision.

A permittee may not transfer, assign, or sell a permit or the rights granted under a permit without the written approval of the commissioner. A successor in interest to a permittee may continue the surface coal mining and reclamation operation of the permittee until the successor’s transfer application is granted or denied if the successor

applies for a new permit within 30 days of succeeding to that interest; and

obtains the same bond coverage as the permittee.

After the commissioner issues a permit, the commissioner shall, within a time limit established by regulation, review the permit and may, for good cause, require reasonable revisions of the permit during the term of the permit. A revision under this subsection must be based on a written finding of the commissioner relating to the need for the revision and is subject to notice and hearing requirements established by the commissioner by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.190. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.200.
Coal exploration permits.

A person may conduct coal exploration activities that substantially disturb the natural land surface only according to regulations adopted by the commissioner. Before conducting the coal exploration activities, the person shall file with the commissioner a notice of intent to explore that includes a description of the exploration area and the period of proposed exploration.

The regulations adopted by the commissioner under (a) of this section must include provisions for reclamation, according to the performance standards established under AS

27.21.210

, of land disturbed by the coal exploration activities, including reclamation of excavations, roads, and drill holes, and the removal of facilities and equipment.

The commissioner shall keep information submitted to the commissioner under this section confidential upon request of the person submitting the information if the information is a

trade secret or relates to a trade secret; or

privileged competitive right of the applicant for the coal exploration permit.

A person who conducts a coal exploration activity that substantially disturbs the natural land surface in violation of the requirements of this section or regulations adopted under this section is subject to the provisions of AS

27.21.240

.

A person may not remove more than 250 tons of coal under a coal exploration permit without the specific written approval of the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.200. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.210.
Performance standards.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations consistent with the environmental performance standards of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 and the regulations promulgated under that Act for both surface coal mining and reclamation operations and surface effects of underground mining with appropriate adjustments to the special physical, hydrological, biological, and climatic conditions in the state. All permits issued under this chapter shall require that surface coal mining and reclamation operations and coal exploration activities must comply with those environmental performance standards.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 33 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.210. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.220.
Surface effects of underground coal mining.

The provisions of this chapter apply to the surface effects of underground coal mining. However, the commissioner shall consider the inherent difference between underground mining and surface mining in adopting regulations under this chapter that apply to underground mining.

In order to protect the stability of the land, the commissioner shall suspend underground coal mining under municipalities or communities and adjacent to industrial or commercial buildings, major impoundments, or permanent streams, if the commissioner finds imminent danger to inhabitants of the municipalities or communities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.220. Renumbered in 1983.